Utah statutes.
67-24-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Lobbying" is as defined in Section 36-11-102.

(2)  "Lobbyist" is as defined in Section 36-11-102.

(3)  "State official" means:

(a)  a member of the Legislature;

(b)  the governor;

(c)  the lieutenant governor;

(d)  the state auditor;

(e)  the state treasurer; and

(f)  the attorney general.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2009 General Session

